Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0150.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 11c. (1) All Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, all construction projects of the department concerning highways, streets, roads, and bridges, whose cost exceeds $100,000.00 for construction or preservation as that term is defined in section 10c, shall must be performed by contract awarded by competitive bidding unless the department affirmatively finds that under the circumstances relating to those projects, some other method is in the public interest. The director of the department shall report his or her findings to the state transportation commission 90 days before work is commenced and promptly in writing to the appropriations committees of the senate and house of representatives. However, in a case in which if the department determines emergency action is required, the reports need not be filed before a contract is awarded but shall must be promptly filed. The installation or upgrading of advanced traffic operation centers and traffic signal systems is exempt from this subsection. (2) All Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, all construction projects of a local road agency whose costs exceed $100,000.00 for construction or preservation, excluding maintenance, shall that meet the criteria described in subsection (3) must be performed by contract awarded by competitive bidding unless the local road agency affirmatively finds that under the circumstances relating to those projects, some other method is in the public interest. Installation or upgrading of advanced traffic management operation centers and signals is traffic signal systems and the resurfacing of local roads are exempt from this subsection. A county road commission shall report its findings before work is commenced in writing to the county board of commissioners of that county. A city or village shall report its findings before work is commenced in writing to the governing elected body of that city or village. As used in this subsection, "local road agency" means that term as defined in section 9a. (3) Subsection (2) applies to the construction projects of a local road agency as follows: (a) If the local road agency is a city or village with a population of more than 500,000, to any construction project with costs exceeding $100,000.00 for construction or preservation, excluding routine maintenance. (b) If the local road agency is not a city or village with a population of more than 500,000, to both of the following: (i) To any construction project with individual project or contiguous project costs exceeding $250,000.00 for construction or preservation, excluding routine maintenance. (ii) To each construction project after a local road agency exceeds $800,000.00 in total costs for construction or preservation, excluding routine maintenance, in a fiscal year. (4) As used in this section, "local road agency" means that term as defined in section 9a.